05_Project/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V-cuire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: cui%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: cuis%>ant #;				! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: cui Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: cui V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: cuis V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: cuis V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: cui%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: cui%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: cui%>s V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: cuis%>iss V-ImperfSubj;	! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: cuis%>ît #;	! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: cui%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: cuis%>ez #;

LEXICON V-dire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: di%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: dis%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: dit Adj;					! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: di V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: dit%>es #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: dis%>ent #;	! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: dis V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: di%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: di%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: di%>s V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: diss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: dît #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: di%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: dit%>ez #;

LEXICON V-etre
%<c3%>%<inf%>: être #;									! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: ét%>ant #;						! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: été Adj;						! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: suis #;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: es #;				! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: est #;				! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: êt%>es #;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: sont #;			! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: ét V-ImperfIndic-re;			! imperfect indicative

%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: sirai #;			! future indicative simple
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: sera #;				! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: ser  V-ImperfIndic;				! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: soit #;				! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: soient #;			! present subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: sois #;					! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: soyez #;					! imperative

LEXICON V-faire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: faire #;									! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: fais%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: fait Adj;						! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: fais #;			! present indicative doublecheck these
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: fais #;				! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: fait #;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: fait%>es #;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: font #;			! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: fais%>ais #;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: fais%>ais #;		! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: fais%>ait #;		! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: fais%>ez #;		! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: fais%>aient #;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<pl%>: fais%>iont #;

%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: fer V-FutIndic;					! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: fer V-ImperfIndic-re;			! present conditional
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: fass V-FutIndic;				! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: fiss V-ImperfSubj;			! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: fît #;			! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: fais #;					! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: faites #;					! imperative

! This verb is only conjugated in 3P.S
LEXICON V-falloir
%<c4%>%<inf%>: fall%>oir #;								! infinitive
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<part%>: fall%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c4%>%<past%>%<part%>: fall%>u AdjMF;					! past participle

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: faut #;
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: fall%>ait #;

%<c4%>%<fut%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: faudr%>a #;
%<c4%>%<pres%>%<cond%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: faudr%>ait #;

%<c4%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: faill%>e;						! present subjunctive
%<c4%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: fall%>ût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

LEXICON V-lire
%<c3%>%<inf%>: li%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: lis%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: lu Adj;						! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: li V-PresIndic-SG-re;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: lis V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: lis V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: li%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: li%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;		! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: li%>s V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: luss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: lût #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>: li V-Imperative-re;				! imperative

LEXICON V-mettre
%<c3%>%<inf%>: mett%>re #;							! infinitive
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<part%>: mett%>ant #;					! present participle
%<c3%>%<past%>%<part%>: mis Adj;						! past participle

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<1p%>%<sg%>: mets #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: mets #;		! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: met #;			! present indicative
%<c3%>%<pres%>%<indic%>: mett V-PresIndic-PL;		! present indicative

%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<indic%>: mett V-ImperfIndic-re;	! imperfect indicative
%<c3%>%<fut%>%<indic%>: mett%>r V-FutIndic;			! future indicative simple

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<cond%>: mett%>r V-ImperfIndic-re;	! present conditional

%<c3%>%<pres%>%<subj%>: mett V-PresSubj;			! present subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>: miss V-ImperfSubj;		! imperfect subjunctive
%<c3%>%<imperf%>%<subj%>%<3p%>%<sg%>: mît #;		! imperfect subjunctive

%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<sg%>: met%>s #;				! imperative
%<c3%>%<imper%>%<2p%>%<pl%>: mett%>ez #;

LEXICON Verbs
cuire%<verb%>: V-cuire;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to cook"
dire%<verb%>: V-dire;				! VERB TRANSITIVE? "to say, tell"
être%<verb%>: V-etre;				! VERB "to be"
faire%<verb%>: V-faire;				! VERB TRANSITIVE/INTRANSITIVE/PRON "to make"
falloir%<verb%>: V-falloir;			! VERB (only "faut") "to have to, to be necessary"
lire%<verb%>: V-lire;				! VERB TRANSITIVE "to read" IRREGULAR
mettre%<verb%>: V-mettre;			! VERB TRANSITIVE/PRON "to put; to put on oneself, to go" IRREGULAR
